Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1930
Civil cases; writs of error abolished.

Writs of error to reverse, vacate, or modify judgments or final orders in civil cases are abolished, but courts shall have the same power to compel complete and perfect transcripts of the proceedings containing the judgment or final order sought to be reversed to be furnished as they formerly had under writs of error.

R.S.1867, Code § 599, p. 500;

R.S.1913, § 8202;

C.S.1922, § 9155;

C.S.1929, § 20-1930;

R.S.1943, § 25-1930;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 63.

Alleged errors argued in a brief before the district court but not assigned in the petition in error will not be considered. County of Hayes v. County of Frontier, 319 Neb. 98, 21 N.W.3d 474 (2025).

Alleged errors in a petition in error must be assigned with particularity. County of Hayes v. County of Frontier, 319 Neb. 98, 21 N.W.3d 474 (2025).

Writ of prohibition was not abolished by this section. State ex rel. Wright v. Barney, 133 Neb. 676, 276 N.W. 676 (1937).

Effect of abolishment of writ of certiorari stated. Engles v. Morgenstern, 85 Neb. 51, 122 N.W. 688 (1909); Mathews v. Hedlund, 82 Neb. 825, 119 N.W. 17 (1908); Moline, Milburn & Stoddard Co. v. Curtis, 38 Neb. 520, 57 N.W. 161 (1893).

Supreme Court may order court to send up perfect transcript but cannot order amendment of record. Thompson & Sons Mfg. Co. v. Nicholls, 52 Neb. 312, 72 N.W. 217 (1897).

Order entered in habeas corpus proceedings may be reviewed on error. In re Van Sciever, 42 Neb. 772, 60 N.W. 1037 (1894).